Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.505

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Amount.

The disability leave supplement shall be an amount which, when added to the amount payable under RCW 51.32.090 will result in the employee receiving the same pay he or she would have received for full time active service, taking into account that industrial insurance payments are not subject to federal income or social security taxes.

[ 1985 c 462 s 2.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.